Florida, session 2026, SB824.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 1013.041, Florida Statutes, is created 15 to read: 16 1013.041âStatewide inventory of unimproved real property 17 owned by school districts.â 18 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 19 (a)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Education. 20 (b)ââDistrictâ means each school district as defined in s. 21 1001.30. 22 (c)ââUnimproved real propertyâ means any parcel of land 23 owned in whole or in part by a district that does not contain 24 any vertical improvements, including, but not limited to, 25 buildings, permanent structures, or constructed facilities. 26 (2)âDATA COLLECTION REQUIREMENTS.â 27 (a)âEach district shall annually, by a date established by 28 the department, submit to the department a complete inventory of 29 all unimproved real property owned by the district as of June 30 30 of that year. 31 (b)âFor each parcel of unimproved real property, the 32 district must provide all of the following data to the 33 department in a format prescribed by the department: 34 1.âThe parcel identification number. 35 2.âThe acreage of the parcel. 36 3.âThe address or descriptive location of the parcel. 37 4.âThe date of acquisition of the parcel by the district. 38 5.âThe current use of the parcel, if any. 39 6.âThe fair market value of the parcel, calculated using: 40 a.âThe most recent market value assessed by the county 41 property appraiser; or 42 b.âA district-commissioned appraisal completed within the 43 previous 24 months. 44 (3)âSTATEWIDE REPORT.âThe department shall compile the data 45 collected pursuant to subsection (2) into a statewide report, 46 which must include: 47 (a)âThe total statewide acreage of all unimproved real 48 property owned by districts. 49 (b)âThe aggregate statewide fair market value of such 50 property. 51 (c)âA district-by-district breakdown of such unimproved 52 real property, including: 53 1.âThe total number of parcels per district. 54 2.âThe total acreage per district. 55 3.âThe total fair market value of such parcels per 56 district. 57 4.âEach parcelâs identification number and acreage. 58 (d)âAny trends or findings the department determines 59 relevant to effective statewide land use or long-range 60 facilities planning. 61 (4)âPUBLICATION.âThe department shall publish the statewide 62 report on its website by December 1, 2026, and every 3 years 63 thereafter. 64 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.